Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 1. Department Functions.

Sec. 44.37.010.
Commissioner of natural resources.

The principal executive officer of the Department of Natural Resources is the commissioner of natural resources.

History.

(§ 16 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 7 ch 186 SLA 1960)

Sec. 44.37.011.
Additional procedures for administrative appeals and petitions for reconsideration to the commissioner of natural resources.

This section applies to administrative appeals or petitions for reconsideration of a decision in an administrative appeal to the commissioner of natural resources, except for those administrative appeals or petitions done under AS 38.35 or AS 43.82. If a conflict occurs between this section and other state law existing at the time of enactment of this section, the provisions of this section control.

If a person is aggrieved by a decision of the Department of Natural Resources not made by the commissioner and is otherwise eligible to seek the commissioner’s review of the decision, the person may appeal to the commissioner. The person may not file a petition for reconsideration of the commissioner’s decision on the appeal. The commissioner’s decision on the administrative appeal is a final administrative order for purposes of filing an appeal of the administrative decision to the court.

If a person is aggrieved by a decision of the department made by the commissioner and is otherwise eligible to seek the commissioner’s review of the decision, the person may not appeal that decision to the commissioner; however, the person may petition the commissioner for reconsideration of the commissioner’s decision. The commissioner’s decision made upon reconsideration or the commissioner’s failure to act on the petition for reconsideration is a final administrative order for purposes of filing an appeal of the administrative decision to the court.

If a person has a right to petition for reconsideration under AS

44.62.540

or this section, the person has a total of 20 days, including the time available under AS

44.62.540

, in which to file a petition for reconsideration with the commissioner.

The department may adopt regulations to implement and interpret this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 118 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For appeals, see 11 AAC 2.

For park uses, see 11 AAC 18, art. 1.

For preserve activities; management, see 11 AAC 21, art. 2.

For tide and submerged lands, see 11 AAC 62.

For shore fisheries leasing, see 11 AAC 64.

For personal use cabin permits, see 11 AAC 65.

For exploration licensing, see 11 AAC 82, art. 9.

For mining production royalty, see 11 AAC 86, art. 9.

For practice and procedure, see 11 AAC 88.

For appeals, see 11 AAC 93, art. 7.

For critical water management areas, see 11 AAC 93, art. 9.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 5, ch. 118, SLA 2000 provides that this section “applies to an administrative appeal first filed with the Department of Natural resources on or after June 7, 2000”.

Sec. 44.37.020.
Duties of department with respect to natural resources.

The Department of Natural Resources shall administer the state program for the conservation and development of natural resources, including forests, parks, and recreational areas, land, water, agriculture, soil conservation, and minerals including petroleum and natural gas, but excluding commercial fisheries, sport fish, game, and fur-bearing animals in their natural state.

The Department of Natural Resources shall administer and maintain a recording system established under the laws of this state.

The Department of Natural Resources in coordination with the Department of Environmental Conservation may take actions necessary to administer and enforce any dredge and fill permitting program allowed under 33 U.S.C. 1344 (sec. 404, Clean Water Act), including the adoption of regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 16 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 7 ch 186 SLA 1960; am E.O. No. 47, § 2 (1980); am § 2 ch 12 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For findings related to (c) of this section, see sec. 1, ch. 12, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

For duties of the department and the Department of Environmental Conservation relating to assuming primacy of the dredge and fill permitting program allowed under 33 U.S.C. 1344 (sec. 404, Clean Water Act), see AS

46.03.020

and sec. 4, ch. 12, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective May 22, 2013, added (c).

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 12, SLA 2013 (SB 27), see 2013 Senate Journal 60 — 61.

Sec. 44.37.025.
Recording.

The Department of Natural Resources shall adopt regulations establishing, modifying, or discontinuing recording districts or precincts and prescribing the records to be maintained and the instruments to be recorded, consistent with AS 40.17. A regulation may not impose a restriction on document recording unless the restriction is required by statute or furthers a legitimate administrative need of the recorder; a “legitimate administrative need” includes ensuring the legibility of the documents and identifying the parties, the capacity of each party, and the affected property.

The department shall prescribe by regulation and account for recording fees and do all other things necessary to maintain the recording systems established under the laws of this state. For a document that is to be recorded for multiple purposes, the department may collect the applicable recording fee for each of the multiple purposes.

The department, with the concurrence of the administrative director of the Alaska Court System, may appoint judicial employees to perform services in connection with recording, providing access to, and copying documents in locations where the department has not otherwise designated a public office to perform those functions.

[Repealed, § 14 ch 119 SLA 1996.]

In addition to the recording system established under AS 40.17, the commissioner of natural resources may by regulation establish a system for recording and filing documents to enable members of the public to safeguard documents. Recording or filing a document in the system established under this subsection does not provide constructive notice for any purpose.

Under AS

37.05.146(c)

, fees for services of the Department of Natural Resources for recording and related services under this section shall be accounted for separately, and appropriations from the account are not made from the unrestricted general fund.

History.

(E.O. No. 47, § 3 (1980); am § 64 ch 21 SLA 1985; am § 73 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 83 SLA 1988; am §§ 40, 41 ch 161 SLA 1988; am § 18 ch 90 SLA 1991; am § 29 ch 2 FSSLA 1992; am §§ 9, 14 ch 119 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 51 SLA 2001; am § 44 ch 8 SLA 2011)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2002, in subsection (f), “AS

37.05.146(c)

” was substituted for “AS

37.05.146(b)

” to reflect the 2002 renumbering of
AS

37.05.146

.

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective May 10, 2011, substituted “the Alaska Court System” for “courts” in (c).

Sec. 44.37.027.
Uniform commercial code filing.

The Department of Natural Resources shall maintain a central filing office for the filing of documents relating to secured transactions under AS 45.29.

The Department of Natural Resources may adopt regulations prescribing the records to be maintained and the documents to be filed, consistent with AS 45.29, and regulations authorizing the forms to be used under AS

45.29.516(b)(8)

.

The Department of Natural Resources shall prescribe in regulation, and account for, filing fees and shall do all other things necessary to maintain the central filing office. For a document that is to be filed for multiple purposes, the department may collect the applicable filing fee for each of the multiple purposes.

To keep the filing office regulations and practices of the filing office in harmony with the regulations and practices of filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact laws that are substantially similar to AS

45.29.501

—

45.29.525

, and to keep the technology used by the filing office compatible with the technology used by filing offices in those other jurisdictions, the Department of Natural Resources, so far as is consistent with the purposes, policies, and provisions of AS

44.37.010

—

44.37.050

, in adopting, amending, and repealing filing office regulations, shall

consult with filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact laws that are substantially similar to AS

45.29.501

—

45.29.525

; and

consult the most recent version of the Model Rules promulgated by the International Association of Corporate Administrators or any successor organization; and

take into consideration the regulations and practices of, and the technology used by, filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact laws that are substantially similar to AS 45.29.501 — 45.29.525.

The Department of Natural Resources shall report annually on or before January 15 to the governor on the operation of the filing office described in AS

45.29.501(a)(2)

. The report must contain a statement of the extent to which the filing office regulations are not in harmony with

the regulations of filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact laws that are substantially similar to AS

45.29.501

—

45.29.525

and the reasons for these variations; and

the most recent version of the Model Rules promulgated by the International Association of Corporate Administrators, or any successor organization, and the reasons for these variations.

Under AS

37.05.146(c)

, fees for services of the Department of Natural Resources related to uniform commercial code filing under this section shall be accounted for separately, and appropriations from the account are not made from the unrestricted general fund.

History.

(§ 10 ch 119 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 4 ch 51 SLA 2001; am § 3 ch 76 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.09” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

In 2002, in subsection (f), “AS

37.05.146(c)

” was substituted for “AS

37.05.146(b)

” to reflect the 2002 renumbering of
AS

37.05.146

.

In 2003, in subsection (d), “AS

44.37.010

—

44.37.050

” was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the 2003 addition of AS

44.37.065

—

44.37.069

.

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective July 1, 2008, added “and regulations authorizing the forms to be used under AS

45.29.516(b)(8)

” to subsection (b).

Sec. 44.37.030.
Duties of department with respect to agriculture.

The Department of Natural Resources shall

obtain and publish information electronically and in print on subjects connected with agriculture, including community seed libraries established under AS

03.20.120

;

control and regulate the entry and transportation of seeds, plants, and other horticultural products;

control and eradicate the spread of pests injurious to plants, trees, vegetables, livestock, and poultry;

aid in developing used and unused agricultural resources; and

experiment and determine practical methods of growing, processing, soil analysis, eradication of obnoxious weeds, control of insects, and cheaper and more satisfactory methods of land clearing.

The Department of Natural Resources may

advise persons who establish or operate a community seed library under AS

03.20.120

; and

post on the department’s Internet website and annually update the following:

information about noncommercial giving or exchanging of seed, including information about community seed libraries established under AS

03.20.120

, community seed library locations, community seed library facilitators, and best practices for noncommercial giving or exchanging of seed;

an online registration form for a person involved in noncommercial giving or exchanging of seed to submit to the department for publication, without a fee, information under AS

03.20.140

;

information provided for publication under (B) of this paragraph.

History.

(§ 33-1-1 ACLA 1949; am §§ 6, 7 ch 87 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For seed regulations, see 11 AAC 34, art. 1.

For pest control, see 11 AAC 34, art. 2.

For birds, see 11 AAC 34, art. 3.

The 2018 amendment, effective August 18, 2018, in (a), rewrote (1), which read, “get and distribute information on subjects connected with agriculture”, and made a stylistic change in (3); added (b).

Sec. 44.37.040.
Duties of department with respect to historic preservation and archeology.

The Department of Natural Resources shall

sponsor, engage in, and direct fundamental research into the archeology of the state and encourage and coordinate archeological research and investigation undertaken in the state;

cooperate with the Alaska Historical Commission in performing their functions under AS 41.35;

ensure that historic, prehistoric, and archeological resources are properly reported by persons or agencies engaged in public construction work, and protect sites and objects of significance discovered at state sites or discovered during the course of public construction, and encourage the protection of sites and objects discovered during the course of any other construction work;

investigate reported historic, prehistoric, or archeological resources and appraise them for any future excavation, preservation, and interpretation;

serve as a central clearinghouse for information on all historic, prehistoric, and archeological resource excavation in the state.

History.

(§ 9 ch 112 SLA 1974; am E.O. No. 83 § 16 (1993))

Sec. 44.37.050.
Duties of department with respect to management of mental health trust land.

To carry out its duties under AS

38.05.801

, the Department of Natural Resources shall establish a separate unit with responsibility for management of the mental health trust land.

The employees of the unit established under this section are in the exempt service under AS

39.25.110

.

History.

(§ 22 ch 5 FSSLA 1994; am § 2 ch 27 SLA 2002)

Secs. 44.37.055,
44.37.060.
Deputy commissioner; certain powers and duties of the deputy commissioner. [Repealed § 38, E.O. 114 (2008).]